Connecticut, session 2026, HB05534.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) The state of Connecticut
shall be known as the birthplace of the Boys and Girls Club movement,
which began in Hartford in 1860 with the founding of the Dashaway
Club by Mary Goodwin, Alice Goodwin, Elizabeth Hamersley and
Louisa Bushnell, to provide boys with safe, positive and productive
opportunities.
Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) The spring peeper, Pseudacris
crucifer, shall be the state amphibian.
Sec. 3. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) Housatonic marble shall be
the state rock.
Governor's Action:
Approved May 19, 2026